Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.867

Faculty tenure—Tenure rights upon transfer of employment to another community or technical college.

Upon transfer of employment from one community or technical college to another community or technical college within a district, a tenured faculty member shall have the right to retain tenure and the rights accruing thereto which he or she had in his or her previous employment: PROVIDED, That upon permanent transfer of employment to another college district a tenured faculty member shall not have the right to retain his tenure or any of the rights accruing thereto.

[ 1991 c 238 s 69; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 43. Formerly RCW 28.85.867.]

NOTES:

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.